src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_lede_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - leđe: # MLO, checked
    leđe+V+Inf: leđe
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lam
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [lah, leh]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: lii
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: [láán, leen, laan]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: leppee
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: [lává, lava]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: lep
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: leppeđ
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: [láá, laa]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: lijjim
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: lijjih
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [lâi]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: [láim, lááim, leim]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: [láid, lááid, leid]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: [láin, lááin, lein]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [lâim, leim]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [lâid, leid]
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: lijjii
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: liččim
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: liččih
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: ličij
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: liččijm
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: liččijd
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: liččijn
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: liččijm
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: liččijd
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: liččii
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: ležžeem
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: ležžeeh
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: [lâš, leš]
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: ležžeen
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: lešvettee
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: [ležžâv, ležžev]
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: [ležžâp, ležžep]
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: lešvetteđ
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: ležeh
    leđe+V+Imprt+Sg2: liähu
    leđe+V+Imprt+Sg3: liävus
    # leđe+V+Imprt+Du1: not known
    # leđe+V+Imprt+Du2: not known
    leđe+V+Imprt+Du3: liähus
    # leđe+V+Imprt+Pl1: not known
    # leđe+V+Imprt+Pl2: not known
    leđe+V+Imprt+Pl3: liähus
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: liähu
    leđe+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: [lamaš, lam]
    leđe+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: liččii
    leđe+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: ližžii
    leđe+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: lah
    leđe+V+Ind+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: [lâš, leš]
    leđe+V+PrsPrc: leijee
    leđe+V+PrfPrc: [lamaš, lam, lámáš]
    # leđe+V+Actio+Nom: not known
    leđe+V+Actio+Ess: lemin
    leđe+V+Actio+Loc: lemist
    # leđe+V+Actio+Ill: not known
    leđe+V+Ger: leđedijn
    # leđe+V+VAbess: not known
